Indiana, session 2026, SB132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-5-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
Chapter 11. Noncompete Agreements
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a noncompete agreement
entered into before April 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "compensation" means any form
of remuneration paid by an employer to an employee. The term
includes the following:
(1) Hourly wages.
(2) Salary.
(3) Commissions.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "employee" means a person
employed or permitted to work or perform services for
remuneration under a contract of hire, written or oral, by an
employer.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "employer" means the following:
2026 IN 132—LS 6377/DI 141


(1) A sole proprietor, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, or other entity with one (1) or more
employees.
(2) A state agency (as defined in IC 22-2-20-5).
(3) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13).
Sec. 5. An employer and an employee may not enter into a
noncompete agreement if the employee's annual compensation is
less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).
Sec. 6. Any agreement in violation of section 5 of this chapter is
void and unenforceable.
Sec. 7. To the extent this chapter conflicts with a provision of
any other Indiana law, including the provisions of IC 25-22.5-5.5,
this chapter prevails.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 132—LS 6377/DI 141